Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 5. OPEN GOVERNMENT; ETHICS

SUBTITLE B. ETHICS

CHAPTER 574. DUAL OFFICE HOLDING

Sec. 574.001. FINDING OF CONSTITUTIONAL COMPLIANCE. (a) A nonelective state officer may not accept an offer to serve in another nonelective office unless the officer obtains from the governing body or, if there is not a governing body, the executive head of the agency, division, department, or institution with which the officer is associated a finding that the officer has satisfied Article XVI, Section 40, of the Texas Constitution.

(b) A person may hold the office of municipal judge for more than one municipality at the same time if each office is filled by appointment. The holding of these offices at the same time is of benefit to this state.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 37, Sec. 1, eff. May 5, 1997.

Sec. 574.002. RECORD. A governing body or executive head shall make a record of:

(1) a finding under Section 574.001; and

(2) any compensation that the nonelective officer is to receive from holding the additional office, including salary, bonus, or per diem payment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 574.003. RULES. A governing body or executive head shall adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Text of section effective until January 01, 2025

Sec. 574.004. ASSISTANCE BY ATTORNEY GENERAL. This chapter does not prevent the attorney general from providing assistance to district attorneys, criminal district attorneys, and county attorneys on request by allowing assistant attorneys general to serve as duly appointed and deputized assistant prosecutors, nor does this chapter prohibit the appointment of an assistant attorney general as an attorney pro tem pursuant to Article 2.07, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.101, eff. January 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on January 01, 2025

Sec. 574.004. ASSISTANCE BY ATTORNEY GENERAL. This chapter does not prevent the attorney general from providing assistance to district attorneys, criminal district attorneys, and county attorneys on request by allowing assistant attorneys general to serve as duly appointed and deputized assistant prosecutors, nor does this chapter prohibit the appointment of an assistant attorney general as an attorney pro tem pursuant to Article 2A.104, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 580 (S.B. 341), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.101, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 574.005. LOCAL GOVERNMENT OFFICERS ON STATE GOVERNING BODIES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Local government" means a county, a municipality, a special district or authority, or another political subdivision of this state.

(2) "State agency" means a department, commission, board, office, council, authority, or other agency in the executive branch of state government that is created by the constitution or a statute of this state, including a university system or institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

(b) An individual who holds an elected or appointed local government office may be appointed to the governing body of a state agency if otherwise eligible. The individual may not receive compensation for serving on the governing body of the state agency but may be reimbursed as provided by other law for a reasonable and necessary expense incurred in the performance of an official function.

(c) Rules adopted under Section 574.003 are not required to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 879, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.